New York, session 2025-2026, S8011.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4 of chapter 668 of the laws of 1977, amending the 2 volunteer firefighters' benefit law relating to disability due to 3 disease or malfunction of the heart or coronary arteries, as amended by 4 section 1 of item CC of subpart B of part XXX of chapter 58 of the laws 5 of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 4. The provisions of section two of this act shall remain in full 7 force and effect to and including the thirtieth day of June, [2025] 8 2030. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11982-01-5